ro-RO: Tipul de conexiune pentru lanț: Jumătate de za (preinstalată); PowerLock; Za rapidă (reutilizabilă); Za rapidă (de unică folosință); Nit; Za cu arc; Altele
pl: Typ połączenia łańcucha: Półogniwo (wstępnie zamontowane); PowerLock; Spinka (wielokrotnego użytku); Spinka (jednorazowa); Nitowane; Ogniwo ze spinką sprężystą; Inny
zh-TW: 鏈條連接類型: 半目 (預先安裝); PowerLock; 快扣 (可重複使用); 快扣 (一次性使用); 鉚釘; 彈簧扣; 其他
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อโซ่: ข้อต่อครึ่งข้อ (ติดตั้งไว้ล่วงหน้า); PowerLock; ปลดเร็ว (นำกลับมาใช้ใหม่ได้); ปลดเร็ว (ใช้ครั้งเดียว); หมุดย้ำ; ข้อต่อสปริง; อื่นๆ
da: Kædeforbindelsestype: Halvled (forudinstalleret); PowerLock; Samleled (genanvendeligt); Samleled (engangs); Nitte; Fjederled; Andet
sv: Kedjekopplingstyp: Halvlänk (förinstallerad); PowerLock; Snabblänk (återanvändbar); Snabblänk (engångs); Nit; Fjäderlås; Övrigt
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης αλυσίδας: Ημι-κρίκος (προεγκατεστημένος); PowerLock; Ταχυσύνδεσμος (επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμος); Ταχυσύνδεσμος (μίας χρήσης); Πριτσίνι; Κρίκος με ελατήριο; Άλλο
fi: Ketjun kytkentätyyppi: Puolilenkki (esiasennettu); PowerLock; Pikalukko (uudelleenkäytettävä); Pikalukko (kertakäyttöinen); Niitti; Jousilukko; Muu
sk-SK: Typ reťazového spojenia: Polčlánok (predinštalovaný); PowerLock; Rýchlospojka (opakovane použiteľná); Rýchlospojka (jednorazová); Nit; Pružinový článok; Iné
zh-CN: 链条连接类型: 半链节（预装）; PowerLock; 快扣（可重复使用）; 快扣（一次性）; 铆钉; 弹簧扣; 其他
tr: Zincir bağlantı tipi: Yarım bakla (önceden takılmış); PowerLock; Hızlı bağlantı (yeniden kullanılabilir); Hızlı bağlantı (tek kullanımlık); Perçin; Yaylı bağlantı; Diğer
cs: Typ spojení řetězu: Půlčlánek (předinstalovaný); PowerLock; Rychlospojka (vícenásobné použití); Rychlospojka (jednorázová); Nýt; Pružinový spoj; Jiný
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação da corrente: Meio elo (pré-instalado); PowerLock; Elo rápido (reutilizável); Elo rápido (uso único); Rebite; Elo de mola; Outro
ru: Тип соединения цепи: Полузвено (предустановленное); PowerLock; Замок цепи (многоразовый); Замок цепи (одноразовый); Пин (заклепка); Пружинное звено; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta zaključkov verige: Polovični člen (prednameščen); PowerLock; Hitri člen (za večkratno uporabo); Hitri člen (za enkratno uporabo); Kovica; Vzmetni člen; Drugo
vi: Loại kết nối xích: Nửa mắt xích (lắp sẵn); PowerLock; Khóa nối nhanh (có thể tái sử dụng); Khóa nối nhanh (dùng một lần); Đinh tán; Khóa lò xo; Khác
fr: Type de raccord de chaîne: Demi-maillon (préinstallé); PowerLock; Maillon rapide (réutilisable); Maillon rapide (à usage unique); Rivet; Maillon à ressort; Autre
ko: 체인 연결 유형: 하프 링크(사전 설치됨); PowerLock; 퀵 링크(재사용 가능); 퀵 링크(일회용); 리벳; 스프링 링크; 기타
nl: Specificeert de sluitmethode die wordt meegeleverd of vereist is om de uiteinden van de ketting te verbinden.: Half-link (vooraf geïnstalleerd); PowerLock; Quick-link (herbruikbaar); Quick-link (eenmalig gebruik); Klinknagel; Veerschakel; Overig
ja: チェーン連携タイプ: 半コマ (取り付け済み); PowerLock; クイックリンク (再利用可能); クイックリンク (使い切り); リベット; スプリングリンク; その他
es: Tipo de unión de la cadena: Medio eslabón (preinstalado); PowerLock; Eslabón rápido (reutilizable); Eslabón rápido (un solo uso); Remache; Eslabón de resorte; Otro
de: Art der Kettenverbindung: Halbglied (vorinstalliert); PowerLock; Kettenschloss (wiederverwendbar); Kettenschloss (Einmalgebrauch); Niet; Federglied; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di catena: Falsa maglia (preinstallata); PowerLock; Maglia rapida (riutilizzabile); Maglia rapida (monouso); Rivetto; Maglia a molla; Altro
en: Chain connection type: Half-link (pre-installed); PowerLock; Quick link (reusable); Quick link (single-use); Rivet; Spring link; Other
hu: Lánckapocs típusa: Félszem (előre telepített); PowerLock; Gyorscsatlakozó (többször használatos); Gyorscsatlakozó (egyszer használatos); Szegecs; Rugós csatlakozó; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta lanca veza: Polukarika (unaprijed instalirana); PowerLock; Brza spojnica (višekratna); Brza spojnica (jednokratna); Zakovica; Opružna karika; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão da corrente: Meio elo (pré-instalado); PowerLock; Elo rápido (reutilizável); Elo rápido (uso único); Rebite; Elo de mola; Outro
lt-LT: Grandinės sujungimo tipas: Pusinė jungtis (iš anksto sumontuota); PowerLock; Greitoji jungtis (daugkartinė); Greitoji jungtis (vienkartinė); Kniedė; Spyruoklinė jungtis; Kita
nb: Kjedeforbindelsestype: Halvledd (forhåndsinstallert); PowerLock; Hurtigledd (gjenbrukbart); Hurtigledd (engangs); Nagle; Fjærledd; Annet
bg-BG: Тип верижна връзка: Половин звено (предварително монтирано); PowerLock; Бързо звено (за многократна употреба); Бързо звено (за еднократна употреба); Нит; Пружинно звено; Други